Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-503
State educational institutions; tuition.

All state institutions are empowered to fix tuition and other fees to be paid by students residing in Nebraska.

Laws 1923, c. 57, § 2, p. 178;

C.S.1929, § 85-502;

R.S.1943, § 85-503.